Utah, session 2026, SB185.
Section 1. Section 78B-22-802 is amended to read:78B-22-802. Child Welfare Parental Representation Program -- Creation -- Duties -- Annual report -- Budget.(1)There is created within the office the Child Welfare Parental Representation Program.(2)(a)The office shall:(i)(a)administer and enforce the program in accordance with this part;(ii)(b)manage the operation and budget of the program;(iii)(c)develop and provide educational and training programs for contracted parental representation attorneys;(d)subject to appropriation from the Legislature, provide support for indigent parental defense services through the Indigent Defense Commission grant process;(e)administer the Interdisciplinary Parental Representation Program, established in Section 80-22-805; and(iv)(f)provide information and advice to assist a contracted parental representation attorney to comply with the attorney's professional, contractual, and ethical duties.(b)In administering the program, the office shall contract with:(i)a person who is qualified to perform the program duties under this section; and(ii)an attorney, as an independent contractor, in accordance with Section 78B-22-803.(3)(a)The executive director shall prepare a budget of:(i)the administrative expenses for the program; and(ii)the amount estimatedexpended in the prior year to fund needed contracts, the Interdisciplinary Parental Representation Program, and other parent representation program costs.(b)On or before October 1 of each year, the executive director shall report to the governor and the Child Welfare Legislative Oversight Panel regarding the preceding fiscal year on the operations, activities, and goals of the program.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.